Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-1501
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1501 to 38-1528 shall be known and may be cited as the Hearing Instrument Specialists Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 565;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 19;

Laws 2025, LB332, § 11.